Ohio, session 136, HB425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4561.50 be amended and section 4561.54 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4561.50. As used in sections 4561.50 to 4561.53 4561.54 of the Revised Code: (A) "Critical facility" means any of the following: (1) A critical infrastructure facility as defined in section 2911.21 of the Revised Code; (2) A commercial distribution center; (3) A federal, state, county, or municipal court; (4) A police station, sheriff's office, state highway patrol station, or premises controlled by the bureau of criminal identification and investigation; (5) A federal, state, county, or municipal jail or prison or any other facility in which persons are incarcerated; (6) A federal or state military installation or facility; (7) A hospital that receives air ambulance services. (B) "Unmanned aerial vehicle" means a powered, aerial vehicle to which all of the following apply: (1) The vehicle does not carry a human operator and is operated without the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the vehicle; (2) The vehicle uses aerodynamic forces to provide lift; (3) The vehicle can fly autonomously or be piloted remotely; (4) The vehicle is either expendable or recoverable. "Unmanned aerial vehicle" is commonly referred to as a drone and does not include a satellite. (C) "Unmanned aerial vehicle system" means an unmanned aerial vehicle and associated elements, including communication links and components that control the unmanned aerial vehicle and that are required for the remote pilot in command to operate the vehicle in the air space over this state. (D) "Park district" means a park district created in accordance with Chapter 1545. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4561.54. (A) No person, without privilege to do so, shall knowingly operate an unmanned aerial vehicle system in the air space above the land or premises of another. (B) No person, without privilege to do so, shall recklessly operate an unmanned aerial vehicle system in the air space above the land or premises of another when a notice against unauthorized access to such land or premises is given through one of the following: (1) Actual communication to the person; (2) A notice that is posted in a manner reasonably calculated to come to the attention of potential intruders; (3) By fencing or another form of enclosure manifestly designed to restrict access. (C) No person, without privilege to do so, shall negligently continue to operate an unmanned aerial vehicle system in the air space above the land or premises of another after being given a direct notification to leave that air space by the owner or occupant of the property. (D) No person, without privilege to do so, shall knowingly use an unmanned aerial vehicle system to videotape, film, photograph, broadcast, stream, capture audio, or otherwise record another person, in a place where that person has a reasonable expectation of privacy. (E) No person, without privilege to do so, shall knowingly use an unmanned aerial vehicle system to videotape, film, photograph, broadcast, stream, capture audio, or otherwise record another person's private property, including any animals or objects on another person's private property. (F) No person, without privilege to do so, shall knowingly use an unmanned aerial vehicle system to deploy any substance, material, projectile, or object. (G) Whoever violates this section is guilty of a fourth degree misdemeanor. Section 2. That existing section 4561.50 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.